California statutes. Education Code
(2) Implementing partnerships with the California State University system that incorporate associate degree for transfer pathways that will prepare students for a career in the legal profession.

(3) Expanding existing transfer agreements with the University of California that will prepare students for a career in the legal profession.

(4) Providing student advising and guidance to help participants in the Community College Pathway to Law School initiative successfully transfer into the California State University or the University of California.

(b) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, or its authorized designees, may contract with a third-party entity for the purpose of providing administrative support for the expansion of pathways to law school programs.

(c) (1) On or before July 1, 2025, the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall submit a report to the appropriate budget and policy committees of the Legislature
 regarding outcomes resulting from the use of funds pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, the number of students participating in pathways to law school programs, the demographics, graduation, and success rates of those students, and transfer pathways established.

(2) This subdivision shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2026, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 63.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Subdivision (c) inoperative January 1, 2026, pursuant to its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 53.7. Rebuilding Nursing Infrastructure Grant Program [88770. - 88773.]

88770.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Rebuilding Nursing Infrastructure Grant Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 71, Sec. 10.   (SB 155)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88773.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 88773.)
-------------------------------------------

88771.

As used in this part, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Applicant” means a community college district that submits an eligible application pursuant to this part.

(b) “Chancellor” means the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(c) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(d) “Grant” means a grant awarded pursuant to this part.

(e) “Program” means the Rebuilding Nursing Infrastructure Grant Program
 established pursuant to this part.

(f) “Recipient” means a community college district that receives a grant pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 71, Sec. 10.   (SB 155)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88773.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 88773.)
-------------------------------------------

88772.

(a) The Rebuilding Nursing Infrastructure Grant Program is hereby established as a competitive grant program under the administration of the chancellor.

(b) The funding for the program shall be awarded as grants by the chancellor to applicants for any one or combination of the following purposes:

(1) Developing or expanding bachelor of science in nursing partnerships, including established partnerships with the California State University, the University of California, or independent institutions of higher education as defined in Section 66010.

(2) Developing or expanding associate degree in nursing programs.

(3) Developing strategies for recruiting, retaining, and training high-quality nursing faculty, including, but not limited to, by offering incentives, including stipends and flexible working hours, to recruit and retain nursing faculty, and by providing professional development opportunities.

(4) Developing strategies for increasing nursing program credentials, including, but not limited to, efforts to address noncompliance issues raised by the Board of Registered Nursing and to obtain accreditation from the Accreditation Commission for Education in Nursing.

(5) Developing strategies for engaging and retaining nursing students, including, but not limited to, the integration of high-impact and diversity-, equity-, and inclusion-focused curriculum, the development of apprenticeship opportunities, and the expansion of
 student support services including basic needs assistance, mental health support, case management, counseling services, and specialized tutoring.

(6) Developing strategies that facilitate the increase of the percentage of associate degree nursing to bachelor of science in nursing students, including, but not limited to, the development of strategies that strengthen the high school to community college nursing pipeline.

(7) Purchasing equipment for nursing education programs.

(8) Developing or scaling efforts that lead to additional clinical placements for nursing students.

(c) The chancellor shall develop an application for applicants to apply for a grant. The application may be an extension of the application used for the Nursing Enrollment Growth and
 Retention program under Section 78261. The chancellor shall make the application for the first round of grants available on or before November 1, 2024, with grants distributed to recipients on or before July 1, 2025. Subject to available funding for purposes of this part, the chancellor may administer subsequent application rounds. An application for a grant shall require, at a minimum, all of the following information:

(1) A statement identifying the specific needs or problems the applicant faces with regard to providing access to educating, supporting, graduating, or placing nursing students.

(2) A description of how the applicant is addressing the needs or problems described in paragraph (1) with existing funds, and how receipt of a grant will supplement those efforts.

(3) The amount of a grant requested by an
 applicant, and how the applicant specifically proposes to use the grant for the purposes described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, of subdivision (b).

(4) If applicable, the number of nursing education program slots that the applicant is planning to add each year within the two-year period of grant encumbrance described in subdivision (f) beyond already planned nursing education program slot expansions. A breakdown shall be provided for associate degree in nursing slots and bachelor of science in nursing slots.

(5) If applicable, bachelor of science in nursing partnerships with a campus of the California State University or the University of California, or independent institutions of higher education as defined in Section 66010, that the applicant will develop or expand with receipt of a grant.

(6) A breakdown
 of the amount and use of other funding sources that the applicant is using for nursing education programs, including apportionments, grants under the Nursing Enrollment Growth and Retention Program established in Section 78261, other state or federal workforce grants, and private or in-kind funding sources.

(d) Selection of recipients shall be on a competitive basis. The chancellor shall develop a scoring rubric to evaluate the completeness and quality of each application. The chancellor shall require an application to meet a minimum threshold to be eligible for a grant.

(1) The chancellor shall give priority for grants to applicants that are located in an underserved nursing area or a region with a local nursing shortage.

(2) An applicant receiving a grant in one application round is not prohibited from applying and
 receiving a grant in subsequent application rounds. However, the chancellor may prioritize awarding grants to applicants that have not received a grant.

(3) The chancellor shall give priority for a grant to applicants that expand existing bachelor of science in nursing partnerships with a campus of the California State University or the University of California.

(e) (1) The chancellor shall determine the amount of a grant for each recipient. In determining the amount of a grant for a recipient, the chancellor shall take all of the following factors into account:

(A) The applicant’s requested grant amount in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(B) The applicant’s score on the scoring rubric developed pursuant to subdivision (d).

(C) The total amount of funding available for awarding grants.

(2) A recipient shall not receive a grant that exceeds two million dollars ($2,000,000) per award cycle.

(f) A recipient shall have up to two years to expend a grant. Any unspent amount of the grant at the end of that two-year period of encumbrance shall revert to the chancellor’s office.

(g) As a condition of receiving a grant, a recipient shall report, on or before January 1, 2026, and each January 1 thereafter to January 1, 2030, inclusive, all data and information to the chancellor’s office that the chancellor determines furthers the purposes of the program. A report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall include all of the following:

(1) The number of additional nursing education program enrollment slots created with the use of grants.

(2) Student outcomes, including course success rates, persistence rates, graduation rates, and, if possible, employment placement outcomes.

(3) How the grant was used by expenditure category, as described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, of subdivision (b).

(4) The extent to which the grant, combined with other funding sources, addressed regional workforce needs.

(h) On or before July 1, 2026, and each July 1 thereafter to July 1, 2030, inclusive, the chancellor’s office shall compile and provide a summary of the information received pursuant to subdivision (g) to the Assembly and Senate
 Committees on Budget and the Governor. The information shall be provided as part of the report required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 78261. A report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(i) The chancellor may allocate up to 5 percent of the total amount appropriated for purposes of the program for state administrative operations to carry out the intent of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 71, Sec. 10.   (SB 155)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88773.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 88773.)
-------------------------------------------

88773.

(a) This part shall become inoperative on July 1, 2030, and, as of January 1, 2031, is repealed.

(b) Any recipient that has not fully expended their grant by July 1, 2030, shall continue adhering to the requirements of this part that were operative on June 30, 2030, until the grant is expended or the encumbrance period described in subdivision (f) ends, whichever occurs first.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 71, Sec. 10.   (SB 155)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.    Repeal affects Part 53.7, commencing with Section 88770.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 53.8. California Career Passport Program [88780. - 88782.]

88780.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Career Passport Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 9, Sec. 13.   (AB 123)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

88781.

For purposes of this part, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(b) “Program” means the California Career Passport Program established pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 9, Sec. 13.   (AB 123)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

88782.

(a) (1) The California Career Passport Program is hereby established. The program shall be administered by the chancellor’s office, in partnership with the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data and the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, for the purpose of developing a Career Passport that provides an individual a secure digital tool displaying their preparation for employment, academic records, and credit for prior learning, which may include, but is not limited to, military service.

(2) An individual may use their Career Passport to curate their relevant validated skills, which may include skills attributable to verifiable credentials and academic records, in a shareable format for skills-based and competency-informed
 hiring by employers. An individual may share all or part of their Career Passport with outside entities.

(b) The program shall be developed by leveraging existing statewide tools for documenting academic learning, including, but not limited to, eTranscript California and other electronic transcript tools, and existing tools for validating learning in nonacademic contexts, including, but not limited to, providing credit for prior learning and the California Mapping Articulated Pathways Initiative, and combining those tools into the Career Passport that can be integrated with employer-based hiring systems to support skills-based hiring.

(c) The program shall at least accomplish all of the following goals:

(1) Enable the linkage, management, and monitoring of information of an individual’s verified academic and
 third-party records of education, training, and development of validated skills for the purposes of hiring by employers.

(2) Ensure that information contained in, and available through, the secure digital tool is kept secure and that individual privacy, including, but not limited to, personally identifiable information, is protected.

(3) Provide individuals access to their aggregated information for use in applying for employment and in training at no or low cost to the individual.

(d) The chancellor’s office, in collaboration with the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data, shall convene agency and employer representatives to identify technical and policy considerations for building the secure digital tool described in subdivision (a).

(e) The chancellor’s
 office, in collaboration with the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, shall engage with business and industry leaders collaboratively to ensure Career Passports are useful to, and used by, California’s employers, and shall work closely with the Department of Human Resources as a possible early adopter of Career Passports.

(f) The program shall serve the public good and remain accountable to it.

(g) The program shall comply with federal and state laws to protect individual privacy, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The federal Family Education Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-380, as amended).

(2) The federal Higher Education Act of 1965 (Public Law 89-329, as amended).

(3) The federal Privacy Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-579, as amended).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 9, Sec. 13.   (AB 123)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 54. Community Colleges Basic Skills and Student Outcomes Transformation Program [88800. - 88810.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [88800. - 88810.]

88800.

A financial and professional development grant funding program, administered by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, is hereby established. The chancellor shall distribute multiyear grants, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the governing boards of community college districts pursuant to applications that satisfy the requirements of this part. Moneys allocated pursuant to this program shall be expended for community colleges within a district that receives a grant to adopt or expand the use of evidence-based models of academic assessment and placement, remediation, and student support that accelerate the progress of underprepared students toward achieving postsecondary educational and career goals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 22, Sec. 20.   (SB 81)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

88805.

(a) (1) The governing board of a community college district may apply for funds pursuant to this part for the purpose of making more effective, evidence-based practices available to more underprepared students who enroll at campuses of the California Community Colleges. A community college within the district may receive funds to implement these evidence-based practices for the first time or to expand to additional students any evidence-based practices that are in effect as of the date of the district’s application for funds.

(2) Community colleges may use funds allocated pursuant to this part to support remedial education curriculum redesign, professional development and
 release time for faculty, and support staff as appropriate, and data collection and reporting.

(b) The evidence-based practices implemented or expanded pursuant to funding received as specified in subdivision (a) shall include basic skills improvement strategies that have demonstrated effectiveness in accelerating the progress of underprepared students toward, and increasing the number of underprepared students who successfully achieve in a timely manner, one or both of the following goals:

(1) Completing a college-level English or mathematics course, or both, within a sequence of three or fewer courses after enrollment in a community college, to prepare students for college-level work.

(2) Earning an industry-relevant college certificate or degree within two years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 22, Sec. 20.   (SB 81)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

88810.

(a) In order to receive a grant, the governing board of a community college district shall demonstrate in its application for funding, consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 88805, that the community colleges that are to participate in the grant program will redesign their curriculum, career pathways, assessment and placement procedures, or any combination thereof, to implement, or significantly expand the use or application of, two or more of the following evidence-based practices and principles:

(1) Adopting placement tests or other student assessment indicators and related policies that may include multiple measures of student performance, including grades in high school courses, especially overall grade point average, results from the common assessment
 system, and input from counselors.

(2) Increasing the placement of students directly in gateway English and mathematics courses that are transferable to the University of California or the California State University and career pathways, with remedial instruction integrated as appropriate for underprepared students.

(3) Aligning content in remedial courses with the students’ programs of academic or vocational study to target students’ actual needs and increase relevance. This paragraph is intended to encourage the development of remedial instruction focused on a student’s identified academic need informed by the student’s intended course of study.

(4) Contextualizing remedial instruction in foundational skills for the industry cluster, pathways, or both, in which the student seeks to advance.

(5) Providing proactive student support services that are integrated with the instruction provided.

(6) Developing two- and three-course sequences, as appropriate, for completion of a college-level English or mathematics course, or both, for underprepared students, by either utilizing technology, where appropriate, to enhance the adoption of the high impact practices specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, or implementing other effective basic skills course strategies and practices not specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, subject to the college providing evidence that substantiates the practice is effective.

(b) Community colleges are encouraged to collaborate with local school districts serving kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, to better articulate English and math instruction between the
 high schools and the community colleges.

(c) Each participating community college shall be responsible for all of the following:

(1) Developing a plan based on two or more of the evidence-based principles and practices described in subdivision (a) that demonstrates a clear strategy for ensuring that both of the following occur within a five-year period:

(A) A progressively increasing share of the students who enroll at participating community colleges within the community college district achieve the goals listed in subdivision (b) of Section 88805.

(B) A significantly greater share of entering students who are enrolled at the community college achieve the goals listed in subdivision (b) of Section 88805 within a shorter time period than before the
 implementation of the plan at the community college.

(2) Ensuring that the plan developed pursuant to paragraph (1) does all the following:

(A) Describes the community college’s current practices with regard to the selected high impact practices and its readiness to implement the new interventions.

(B) Articulates targets for the share of entering students projected to be served by these interventions over the three-year implementation period.

(C) Sets goals for the share of entering students who complete a college-level English or mathematics course within three semesters or less after enrollment.

(D) Identifies key strategies and implementation benchmarks for evaluating the progress of
 campus efforts to implement the selected interventions.

(E) Details the number of campus faculty likely to be involved in all selected high impact interventions and the plan for addressing their professional and technical assistance needs.

(3) Ensuring that its faculty participate in professional development regarding academic programs or new curriculum developed or expanded pursuant to the plan, using grant funds to support that faculty participation.

(4) Commencing in the year that a community college receives a grant and for the following three fiscal years, annually reporting to the chancellor’s office on program outcomes, disaggregated by the demographic characteristics, high school grade point average, and initial placement level of its students, for purposes of measuring progress compared to the community
 college’s performance before its implementation of the plan. These reports should include all of the following:

(A) The total number and percentage of entering students identified as underprepared before receipt of the grant.

(B) The number and percentage of entering students served by the grant program, disaggregated by type of practice implemented.

(C) The number and percentage of entering students achieving the goals listed in subdivision (b) of Section 88805.

(D) The number of faculty involved and faculty needs regarding the adoption and operation of courses under the plan.

(E) If applicable, a narrative describing any subsequent adjustments to the design of the college’s basic skills
 course practices or strategies adopted pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a).

(F) A description of any additional or expanded student supports offered.

(G) A narrative describing the community college’s efforts to collaborate with local school districts serving kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, to better articulate English and math instruction between the high schools and the community colleges.

(5) These plans should be developed in consultation with campus faculty.

(d) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall be responsible for all of the following:

(1) Developing application criteria, administrative guidelines, and other requirements for
 purposes of administering the grant program. Applications that would do one or both of the following shall be given priority consideration within the application criteria:

(A) Scale up existing practices.

(B) Provide services to greater proportions of students.

(2) Administering the grant program and distributing and monitoring awards to recipient community college districts.

(3) Providing the information submitted pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) to the Legislative Analyst’s Office.

(e) (1) The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall aggregate, analyze, and report the information submitted pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) to the Legislature on the
 progress of the grant program in achieving its prescribed purpose. The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall issue
 a report by December 1, 2019.

(2) (A) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(B) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 129, Sec. 4.   (AB 3374)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 54.3. Student Success for Basic Skills Program [88815. - 88815.]

88815.

(a) There is hereby established the Student Success for Basic Skills Program to be administered by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges in accordance with subdivision (b).

(b) From funds provided in the annual Budget Act for the Student Success for Basic Skills Program, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall allocate:

(1) An amount up to 5 percent for faculty and staff development to improve curriculum, instruction, student services, and program practices in the areas of basic skills and English as a second language programs. The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall
 select a community college district, utilizing a competitive process, to carry out these faculty and staff development activities. All colleges receiving funds pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be provided with the opportunity to participate in the faculty and staff development programs specified in this paragraph.

(2) (A) All other funds for grants to community college districts for improving outcomes of students who enter college needing at least one course in English as a second language or basic skills, with particular emphasis on students transitioning from high school.

(B) Funds allocated pursuant to this paragraph shall be expended for any of the following purposes:

(i) Program and curriculum planning and development, student assessment, advisement and counseling services, supplemental
 instruction and tutoring, articulation, instructional materials and equipment, any other purpose directly related to the enhancement of basic skills, English as a second language instruction, and related student programs.

(ii) To implement or expand upon the use or application of evidence-based practices and principles identified in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 88810.

(iii) To accelerate the adoption and utilization of lower cost, high-quality, open educational resources in English as a second language or basic skills courses.

(iv) To collaborate with high schools, and when applicable, California State University campuses, to better align remedial instruction methodologies, curriculum, and course offerings among local educational agencies, community colleges, and California State
 University campuses.

(v) To implement assessment and placement practices that increase the likelihood that students are appropriately placed in college-level, rather than remedial, courses.

(C) The funds allocated pursuant to this paragraph shall supplement, and not supplant, current expenditures by community college districts for matriculation and assessment services, basic skills, English as a second language instruction, and related student programs.

(D) To be eligible to receive grant funds pursuant to this paragraph, a community college district shall submit to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges an application containing a certification that the college will, within the fiscal year, (i) complete a revised assessment of its programs and activities serving basic skills and English as
 a second language students utilizing the assessment tool developed pursuant to paragraph (1) of Item 6870-493 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2006 (Chapters 47 and 48 of the Statutes of 2006) and (ii) submit to the office of the chancellor an action and expenditure plan for funds received under this paragraph. The grant application shall also contain the strategies a community college district will implement to improve the successful transition of students to college-level math and English courses. These improvements shall include both increasing the number of students that successfully transition to college-level mathematics and English courses as well as reducing the time it takes students to successfully transition to college-level mathematics and English courses. At a minimum, to be eligible to receive a grant, the community college district’s strategy shall include an evidence-based plan for the adoption and implementation of multiple measures of assessment and placement. The office of the
 chancellor shall prioritize funding grant applications from community college districts that participate in the Community Colleges Basic Skills and Student Outcomes Transformation Program established by Part 54 (commencing with Section 88800), or that subsequently implement or expand upon the use or application of evidence-based practices and principles identified in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 88810.

(E) (i) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall distribute grant funds to community college districts that meet the application criteria in subparagraph (D) on the basis of the following weighted factors:

(I) The percentage of students receiving a Board of Governors fee waiver who first enrolled in a course below transfer level in English, mathematics, or English as a second language, or any combination of
 these, and subsequently completed a college-level course in the same subject within one year and within two years. This factor shall comprise 50 percent of the allocation formula.

(II) The percentage of students receiving a Board of Governors fee waiver. This factor shall comprise 25 percent of the formula.

(III) The percentage of basic skills full-time equivalent students in courses offered by that community college district using evidence-based practices and principles identified in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 88810. This factor shall comprise 25 percent of the formula.

(ii) The chancellor may include other factors and adjustments as he or she determines necessary to accomplish the objectives of this paragraph.

(iii) The chancellor shall annually notify and receive concurrence from the Department of Finance in consultation with the Legislative Analyst’s Office prior to including additional factors and adjustments pursuant to clause (ii) and prior to apportioning these funds to community college districts.

(iv) The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of his or her intent to concur with the use of additional factors and adjustments pursuant to clauses (ii) and (iii).

(v) For purposes of distributing the funds, the chancellor shall establish a minimum allocation of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per college in the applying community college district.

(F) Notwithstanding subparagraph (E), commencing with the 2016–17 fiscal year, the Chancellor of the California Community
 Colleges shall adjust the distribution of funds pursuant to subparagraph (E) to ensure that community college districts do not receive less state aid from the Student Success for Basic Skills Program than they received from appropriations for these purposes in the 2015–16 fiscal year.

(G) As a condition of participating in this program, commencing with the 2017–18 fiscal year, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall strongly encourage the five community college districts with the lowest calculated percentages as specified in subclause (I) of clause (i) of subparagraph (E) that participated in this program to apply for a technical assistance team to improve the likelihood that a student is able to expeditiously transition from a basic skills course to a college-level course at that community college district.

(c) (1) The office
 of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall consult with the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst’s Office to develop and recommend annual accountability measures for the program. It is the intent of the Legislature that annual performance accountability measures for the program utilize, to the extent possible, data available as part of the accountability system developed pursuant to Section 84754.5.

(2) On or before March 15, 2020, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in consultation with the Department of Finance and Legislative Analyst’s Office, shall report on the effectiveness of the factors used to allocate funding under this program in improving outcomes for students requiring remediation.

(d) This part shall become operative July 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 22.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 54.5. Strong Workforce Program [88820. - 88833.]

88820.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Strong Workforce Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 23.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

88821.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) California’s economic competitiveness is fueled, in part, by the strength of its regional economies and its skilled workforce.

(2) Upward social and economic mobility helps keep the state’s economy diversified and vibrant.

(3) The attainment of industry-valued “middle skill credentials” serves as a gateway for a large and diverse number of careers in the state’s economy.

(4) California’s local educational agencies, community college districts, interested public four-year universities, local workforce
 development boards, economic development and industry leaders, and local civic representatives should collaboratively work together to inform the offerings of courses, programs, pathways, and workforce development opportunities that enable students to access the current and future job market and further social and economic mobility.

(b) The Strong Workforce Program is hereby established as a K–14 state education, economic, and workforce development initiative for the purpose of expanding the availability of high-quality, industry-valued career technical education and workforce development courses, programs, pathways, credentials, certificates, and degrees.

(c) To facilitate program coordination and alignment with other workforce training, education, and employment services in the state, the Strong Workforce Program shall operate in a manner that complies with the California
 Strategic Workforce Development Plan, required pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128), and expand upon existing consortia infrastructure.

(d) To avoid duplication of effort, activities funded under the Strong Workforce Program shall be informed by, aligned with, and expand upon the activities of existing workforce and education regional partnerships, including those partnership activities that pertain to regional planning efforts established pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128), adult education block grant consortia, and other career technical education programs.

(e) All of the following guiding principles apply to each consortium participating in the Strong Workforce Program:

(1) Any community college district or local
 educational agency participating in the consortium shall ensure that its career technical education and workforce development courses, credentials, certificates, degrees, programs, and pathway offerings, as applicable, are responsive to the needs of employers, workers, civic leaders, and students.

(2) The consortium shall collaborate with other public institutions, including, but not limited to, adult education consortia, local workforce development boards, and interested California State University and University of California institutions.

(3) The consortium shall collaborate with civic representatives, representatives from the labor community, and economic development and industry sector leaders within the region.

(4) The consortium shall include collaborating entities and persons identified in this subdivision in
 planning meetings, provide them with adequate notice of the consortium’s proposed decisions, and solicit, consider, and respond to comments from them regarding the consortium’s proposed decisions.

(5) Collaborative efforts shall focus upon evidence-based decisionmaking and student success with workforce outcomes aligned with the performance accountability measures of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128), and closing labor market and employment gaps. Each consortium shall strive to align programmatic offerings in the most effective and efficient manner to avoid duplication of effort and streamline access to services, and education and training opportunities.

(6) Community college districts, local educational agencies, and other entities participating in a consortium are encouraged to develop long-term partnerships with private sector employers
 and labor partners to provide coordinated courses, programs, and pathways with employer involvement in the assessment, planning, and development of career technical education courses, programs, and pathways. To the extent practicable, employer partnerships should build upon regional partnerships formed pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128) and other state or federal programs.

(7) Community college districts, local educational agencies, and other entities participating in a consortium are encouraged to develop and work closely with public and private organizations that offer workforce development programs and pathways to individuals with autism and other developmental disabilities to provide a comprehensive approach to address workforce readiness and employment.

(f) The chancellor’s office shall, in consultation with the California
 Workforce Development Board, the Academic Senate for California Community Colleges, and its partners formed pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128), as applicable, develop and implement policies and guidance necessary to implement the Community College component of the Strong Workforce Program, including policies and guidance necessary for consortia, including community college districts and their regional partners, to increase the number of aligned middle skill and career technical education courses, programs, pathways, credentials, certificates, and degrees. No later than June 30, 2017, the chancellor’s office shall develop and implement policies and guidance pursuant to this subdivision and bring before the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges any policies, regulations, and guidance necessary to accomplish all of the following:

(1) Facilitate the development, implementation,